Missouri, session 2026, SB1153.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 442.566, 442.571, 442.576, and
442.591, RSMo, are repealed and five new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 442.566, 442.571, 442.576,
442.591, and 442.593, to read as follows:
442.566. As used in sections 442.560 to 442.591,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Agricultural land", any tract of land in this
state consisting of more than five acres, whether inside or
outside the corporate limits of any municipality, which is
capable, without substantial modification to the character
of the land, of supporting an agricultural enterprise,
including but not limited to land used for the production of
agricultural crops or fruit or other horticultural products,
or for the raising or feeding of animals for the production
of livestock or livestock products, poultry or poultry
products, or milk or dairy products. Adjacent parcels of
land under the same ownership shall be deemed to be a single
tract;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1153 2
(2) "Alien", any person who is not a citizen of the
United States and who is not a resident of the United States
or of some state, territory, trusteeship, or protectorate of
the United States;
(3) "Director", the director of the Missouri
department of agriculture;
(4) "Family members" includes all persons within the
ninth degree of consanguinity, or the living or surviving
spouse of any person within the ninth degree of
consanguinity;
(5) "Foreign business", any business entity whether or
not incorporated, including but not limited to companies,
corporations, professional corporations, nonprofit
corporations, limited liability companies, partnerships,
limited partnerships, [and] associations, or the equivalent
of any entity listed in this subdivision, in which a
controlling interest is owned by aliens or organized under
the laws of a foreign country, or both. In determining
ownership of a foreign business, legal fictions such as
corporate form or trust shall be disregarded;
(6) "Residence", the place of general abode; the place
of general abode of a person means his principal, actual
dwelling place in fact, where he intends to remain
permanently or for an indefinite period of time at least.
442.571. 1. Except as provided in sections 442.586
and 442.591, [no alien or foreign business shall acquire by
grant, purchase, devise, descent or otherwise agricultural
land in this state if the total aggregate alien and foreign
ownership of agricultural acreage in this state exceeds one
percent of the total aggregate agricultural acreage in this
state. A sale or transfer of any agricultural land in this
state shall be submitted to the director of the department

SB 1153 3
of agriculture for review in accordance with subsection 3 of
this section only if there is no completed Internal Revenue
Service Form W-9 signed by the purchaser] beginning on the
effective date of this act, no alien, foreign business, or
foreign government shall acquire by grant, purchase, devise,
descent, or otherwise any agricultural land in this state,
including for nonfarming purposes, as defined in section
442.591. Any alien, foreign business, or foreign government
who acquired any agricultural land in this state prior to
the effective date of this act shall not grant, sell, or
otherwise transfer such agricultural land to any other
alien, foreign business, or foreign government on or after
the effective date of this act. No person may hold
agricultural land as an agent, trustee, or other fiduciary
for an alien [or], foreign business, or foreign government
in violation of sections 442.560 to [442.592] 442.593,
provided, however, that no security interest in such
agricultural land shall be divested or invalidated by such
violation.
2. Any alien [or], foreign business, or foreign
government who acquires agricultural land in violation of
sections 442.560 to [442.592] 442.593 remains in violation
of sections 442.560 to [442.592] 442.593 for as long as [he
or she] the alien, foreign business, or foreign government
holds an interest in the land, provided, however, that no
security interest in such agricultural land shall be
divested or invalidated by such violation.
3. Subject to the provisions of subsection 1 of this
section, [such] all proposed [acquisitions] transfers on or
after the effective date of this act by grant, purchase,
devise, descent, or otherwise of any interest in
agricultural land held by any alien, foreign business, or

SB 1153 4
foreign government in this state shall be submitted at least
thirty calendar days prior to when such transfers of such
agricultural land are finalized to the department of
agriculture to determine whether such [acquisition] transfer
of agricultural land, or if land usage changes, is conveyed
in accordance with the [one percent restriction on the total
aggregate] prohibition on alien and foreign ownership of
agricultural land in this state under this act. Such sale
or transfer submitted for review shall be deemed a closed
record under chapter 610 until such sale is finalized. The
department shall establish by rule the requirements for
submission and approval of requests under this subsection.
4. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2014, shall be invalid and void.
442.576. 1. If the director finds that an alien [or],
foreign business, or foreign government or an agent,
trustee, or other fiduciary therefor has acquired
agricultural land in Missouri [in violation of sections
442.560 to 442.592] after the effective date of this act, or
the land ceases to be used for nonagricultural purposes
under section 442.591, he or she shall report the violation
to the attorney general.

SB 1153 5
2. The attorney general shall institute an action in
the circuit court of Cole County or the circuit court in any
county in which agricultural land owned by the alien or
foreign business, agent, trustee or other fiduciary, alleged
to have violated sections 442.560 to [442.592] 442.593, is
located.
3. The attorney general shall file a notice of the
pendency of the action with the recorder of deeds of each
county in which any portion of such agricultural lands is
located. If the court finds that the lands in question have
been acquired in violation of sections 442.560 to [442.592]
442.593, it shall enter an order so declaring and shall file
a copy of the order with the recorder of deeds of each
county in which any portion of the agricultural lands is
located. The court shall order the owner to divest himself
of the agricultural land. The owner must comply with the
order within two years. The two-year limitation period
shall be a covenant running with the title to the land
against any alien grantee or assignee. Provided, however,
an incorporated foreign business must divest itself of
agricultural land within the minimum time required by
Article XI, Section 5, of the Missouri Constitution. Any
agricultural lands not divested within the time prescribed
shall be ordered sold by the court at a public sale in the
manner prescribed by law for the foreclosure of a mortgage
on real estate for default in payment.
442.591. [The restrictions set forth in sections
442.560 to 442.592 shall not apply to agricultural land or
any interest therein acquired by an alien or foreign
business for immediate or potential use in nonfarming
purposes. An alien or foreign business may hold such
agricultural land in such acreage as may be necessary to its

SB 1153 6
nonfarm business operation; provided, however, that pending
the development of agricultural land for nonfarm purposes,
such land may not be used for farming except under lease to
a family farm unit; a family farm corporation defined in
section 350.010; an alien or foreign business which has
filed with the director under sections 442.560 to 442.592;
or except when controlled through ownership, options,
leaseholds or other agreements by a corporation which has
entered into an agreement with the United States of America
pursuant to the New Community Act of 1968 (Title IV of the
Housing and Urban Development Act of 1969, 42 U.S.C. 3901-
3914), as amended, or a subsidiary or assignee of such a
corporation.] 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Foreign adversary", any foreign government or
person identified as a foreign adversary in 15 CFR 791.4;
(2) "Nonfarming", includes, but is not limited to, the
conducting and active operation of research or
experimentation for the purpose of developing or improving
any type of agricultural practice, tool, device, or
implement, or animal health research, animal nutrition
research, raising genetic traits that are used for human or
animal research, or animals raised for exhibition.
2. Beginning on the effective date of this section, no
foreign adversary shall own agricultural land in this state
for nonfarming purposes.
442.593. 1. After the effective date of this act, an
alien, foreign business, or foreign government shall not
acquire any agricultural land in the state for any purpose
within five miles from:
(1) Any reservation, post, arsenal, proving ground,
range, mine field, camp, base, airfield, fort, yard,

SB 1153 7
station, district, or area of the Armed Forces of the United
States; or
(2) Any commercial establishment engaged in the
development or manufacture of classified military or naval
arms, munitions, equipment, designs, ships, aircraft, or
vessels for the Armed Forces of the United States.
2. Any alien, foreign business, or foreign government
who acquired agricultural land described in subsection 1 of
this section in the state prior to the effective date of
this act shall divest itself of the agricultural land.
3. The attorney general shall enforce provisions of
this section. Any individual may report violations of this
section to the attorney general. If the attorney general
believes that a violation occurred, the attorney general
shall commence a civil action in a court of competent
jurisdiction.
4. The attorney general shall file a notice of the
pendency of the action with the recorder of deeds of each
county in which any portion of agricultural land under this
section is located.
5. If the court finds that a violation of this section
has occurred, the court shall enter an order so declaring
and shall file a copy of the order with the recorder of
deeds of each county in which any portion of the
agricultural land under this section is located. The court
shall order the owner to divest itself of the agricultural
land. The owner shall comply with the order within three
years. Any agricultural land not divested within the three
years period under this subsection shall be ordered sold by
the court at a public sale in the manner prescribed by law
for the foreclosure of a mortgage on real estate for default
in payment.

SB 1153 8
Section B. Because of the dangers of foreign ownership
of agricultural land, section A of this act is deemed
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby declared
to be an emergency act within the meaning of the
constitution, and section A of this act shall be in full
force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✓